Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-60] Contested cases. Chapter 91
shall apply except where it conflicts with this chapter. In such a case, this
chapter shall apply. Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, including
chapter 91, any contested case hearing under this section shall be appealed
upon the record directly to the supreme court for final decision. [L 1987, c
45, pt of §2]

Note

The amendment made by
L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in this section.

Case Notes

A water management area designation is not the product of a
contested case hearing, under chapter 91, from which a direct appeal to the
supreme court may be brought under this section. 83 H. 484, 927 P.2d 1367.

This section is inconsistent with and cannot stand together
with §§602-5 and 602-57, as amended by Act 202, L 2004, and was deemed amended
by implication, effective July 1, 2006, to authorize appeals from the water
commission to the intermediate appellate court, not to the supreme court. 113
H. 52, 147 P.3d 836.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next